Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3419
Team; conduct investigations; requirements.

The team shall conduct investigations in accordance with best practices and shall review all relevant records and information in an investigation to understand the relationship between the decedent victim and the perpetrator in order to determine:

(1) Whether a correlation exists between certain events in the relationship and any escalation of abuse;

(2) The factors that contributed to the domestic abuse death;

(3) The public and private systemic response to the decedent victim, an associated victim, and the perpetrator; and

(4) Recommendations and actions that address the contributing factors in the domestic abuse death for change within individuals, communities, public and private agencies, institutions, and systems based on an analysis of the causes and contributing factors of domestic abuse deaths.

Laws 2022, LB741, § 44.